Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Treatment Act of 1973

33-10-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Treatment Act of 1973.”

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-801; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-8-101; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 15; T.C.A. § 68-24-101.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 68, ch. 24, parts 1, 2, 4 and 5 and former title 68, ch. 1, part 6 were transferred to parts 1-5 of this chapter in 2009. See the following parallel reference table for the former and new locations.

Former Sections New Sections

68-24-101 33-10-101

68-24-102 33-10-102

68-24-103 33-10-103

68-24-104 33-10-104

68-24-105 33-10-105

68-24-106 33-10-106

68-24-201 33-10-201

68-24-202 33-10-202

68-24-203 33-10-203

68-24-401 33-10-301

68-24-402 33-10-302

68-24-501 33-10-401

68-24-502 33-10-402

68-24-503 33-10-403

68-24-504 33-10-404

68-24-505 33-10-405

68-24-506 33-10-406

68-24-507 33-10-407

68-24-508 33-10-408

68-24-509 33-10-409

68-24-510 33-10-410

68-24-601 33-10-501

68-24-602 33-10-502

68-24-603 33-10-503

68-24-604 33-10-504

68-24-605 33-10-505

68-24-606 33-10-506

33-10-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alcohol abuse” means a condition characterized by the continuous or episodic use of alcohol that results in social impairment, vocational impairment, psychological dependence or pathological patterns of use;

“Alcoholism” means alcohol abuse that results in the development of tolerance or manifestation of alcohol abstinence syndrome upon cessation of use;

“Drug abuse” means a condition characterized by the continuous or episodic use of a drug or drugs that results in social impairment, vocational impairment, psychological dependence or pathological patterns of use;

“Drug dependence” means drug abuse that results in the development of tolerance or manifestations of drug abstinence syndrome upon cessation of use;

“Indigent person” means a person whose income or resources are determined to be insufficient to pay for needed alcohol and drug abuse services as determined by the department;

“Maintenance” means the cost of all institutional and professional services received by a patient or resident;

“Resident of Tennessee” means an individual who has lived continuously in Tennessee for a period of sixty (60) days and who has not acquired residence in another state by living continuously in another state for at least sixty (60) days subsequent to residing in Tennessee. Time spent in a public institution for the care of the mentally ill or for the intellectually disabled, or on leave of absence from the institution, shall not be counted in determining the question of residence in Tennessee or in another state; and

“Treatment resource” means any public or private facility, service, or program providing treatment or rehabilitation services for alcohol and drug dependence, mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, including, but not limited to, detoxification centers, licensed hospitals, community mental health centers, clinics or programs, halfway houses and rehabilitation centers. This does not include any entity otherwise licensed by the department of health.

Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 2; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2009, ch. 186, § 16; T.C.A. § 68-24-102; Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-10-103. Policy.

Alcoholism and drug dependence are addictive disorders and are recognized and declared to be primary, progressive and chronic diseases and a public health problem affecting the general welfare and economy of the state. The need for proper and sufficient facilities, programs and procedures within the state for the control and treatment and rehabilitation and recovery of alcohol and drug dependent persons is recognized. It is declared that the procedures for the securing of services for such persons are not punitive but rather are for the purpose of treatment of an illness affecting not only the individual involved but also the public welfare.

The policy of the state with reference to alcoholism and drug dependence is declared to be as follows:

The prevention of alcoholism and drug dependence should be accomplished in a number of ways, including public education concerning the causes, symptoms and nature of alcoholism and drug dependence. In order to so educate the public, the department shall prepare and distribute suitable educational material to the schools and interested members of the public, render assistance to suitable local agencies and provide activities promoting public interest in and information about substance abuse and dependence;

As a component of the program described in subdivision (b)(1), the department, in coordination with the department of education, shall increase efforts to educate and raise public awareness of the dangers of methamphetamine manufacture and abuse, including, but not limited to, distribution of public information materials designed to oppose methamphetamine abuse and shall direct persons suffering from the effects of methamphetamine abuse to proper treatment resources;

Programs for assisting the rehabilitation of alcohol and drug dependent persons are properly instituted, financed, and sponsored locally by interested citizens or agencies organized to:

Meet the particular needs of each local community; and

Utilize the available personnel and facilities in each local community;

It is the policy of the state to render needed advice, guidance and assistance in the organization and conduct of such approved local facilities and to supplement local efforts and financing by providing personnel and matching grants or funds; and

Individuals who receive alcohol or drug abuse services should be required to pay the reasonable cost of counseling, assistance, treatment or rehabilitation furnished to them; however, no one should be refused assistance because of the inability to pay for such services.

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 2; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 28; 1981, ch. 224, § 18; T.C.A., § 33-802; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-8-102; Acts 2005, ch. 18, § 3; 2009, ch. 186, § 17; T.C.A. § 68-24-103.

33-10-104. Powers and duties of department — Abuse prevention pilot programs.

The department, through its commissioner, is vested with all necessary and incidental powers for carrying into effect the purposes and programs set forth in this chapter, including the power to promulgate rules and regulations governing the admission, care and discharge of individuals committed or admitted, or both, for alcohol and drug abuse evaluation or treatment as the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate.

It is the duty of the department to formulate and effect a plan for the prevention of alcohol and drug abuse and for the care, treatment and rehabilitation of alcohol and drug dependent persons.

In formulating and effecting the plan, the department shall:

Furnish such aid to alcohol and drug abusers in such manner as to afford them with the greatest benefit; and

Have the power in this connection to make suitable arrangements with hospitals or clinics that afford them proper treatment, care or rehabilitation;

Provide services through existing mental health centers, clinics and other appropriate treatment resources, including state hospitals;

Carry on educational and informational programs on alcoholism and drug dependence for the benefit of the general public, consumers, professional persons or others who care for or may be engaged in the delivery of alcohol and drug abuse services;

Cooperate with physicians and treatment resources in making arrangements for the treatment and care of indigents; and

Have authority to arrange for payment for hospital care on a cost basis for such individuals;

Formulate, undertake and carry out a research and evaluation program on alcoholism and drug dependence; and

Participate in, cooperate with, and assist, as in its discretion shall be deemed advisable, other properly qualified agencies, including any agency of the federal government, schools of medicine and hospitals or clinics, in planning and conducting research on the prevention, care, treatment and rehabilitation of alcohol dependence or drug dependence, or both;

Serve as a clearinghouse for information relating to alcohol and drug abuse;

Develop, encourage and foster statewide, regional and local plans and programs in the field of alcoholism and drug dependence;

Review, comment upon and assist public agencies and local governments with applications for grants or other funds for services for alcohol and drug abusers to be submitted to the federal government;

Enlist the assistance of public and voluntary health, education, welfare and rehabilitation agencies in a concerted effort to prevent and treat alcohol and drug abuse and dependence;

Encourage the development of rehabilitation projects for industries in the state; and

Encourage the development of new treatment facilities.

Through direct administration or through contracting with service providers, the department shall establish comprehensive, culturally relevant, drug and alcohol abuse prevention pilot programs. The pilot programs shall be located in those areas of the state that are especially in need of such programs and that will generate sufficient data to thoroughly measure and evaluate the overall efficiency and effectiveness of such programs. The pilot programs shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the following:

Performance of a minority community needs assessment analysis in order to document specific prevention, treatment and health care needs;

Identification of high risk groups within the minority community;

Arrangement for delivery of needed prevention, treatment and other health care services from among those available to the minority community;

Delivery of a limited number of needed prevention, treatment and health care services not readily available to the minority community;

Utilization of community volunteers and outreach workers to:

Establish rapport;

Provide individual support and encouragement; and

Facilitate networking among social, religious, educational and community agencies and program personnel;

Development and implementation of a culturally relevant public awareness campaign specifically designed to target the minority community; and

Serve as models for the establishment of similar programs in other parts of the state.

Each year, on or before December 31, the department shall report to the governor and to each member of the general assembly concerning implementation of the pilot programs and shall include within the report the findings and recommendations of the department regarding the effectiveness and efficiency of the pilot programs.

Implementation of this subsection (c) shall be limited to the level of funding provided for that purpose within the general appropriations act.

In formulating a plan for the prevention of alcohol and drug abuse and for the care, treatment and rehabilitation of alcohol and drug dependent persons, the department shall make appropriate provision for ensuring that all state and local programs coordinated by the department pursuant to this section and that are targeted at children and youth shall address, through culturally relevant education activities, the hazards of nicotine abuse.

Through grants contracted with community based agencies, the commissioner is authorized to plan, establish and administer pilot projects to develop effective and efficient prevention and treatment services for low-income, pregnant substance abusers. Each of the pilot projects should, to the extent possible within available funding, provide the following:

Public information programs culturally appropriate to the target populations, such information programs to include brochures, public service announcements and other creative and effective means of communication;

Community outreach, interagency liaison, interagency referral mechanisms and specialized training for maternal and child health providers;

Residential beds dedicated exclusively for rehabilitation of low income, pregnant substance abusers;

Intensive, outpatient slots dedicated exclusively for treatment of low income, pregnant substance abusers;

Family intervention services throughout the term of the pregnancy and during a period of postpartum follow-up;

Specialized support services needed to ensure effectiveness of rehabilitation and treatment, including, but not necessarily limited to, transportation services and day care;

Enhanced physician oversight of treatment modalities, to be provided at a level prescribed by the commissioner; and

Documentation and recordkeeping sufficient to enable the commissioner to objectively and systematically evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of the various components of the pilot projects.

In seeking funding support for the pilot projects, the commissioner is authorized to utilize the resources of the United States alcohol, drug abuse, and mental health administration, the United States office of substance abuse prevention, as well as other public and private funding sources for substance abuse prevention and treatment programs. Implementation of the pilot projects shall be limited to the level of funding and resources obtained and provided for that purpose.

Notwithstanding subsection (e), a pregnant woman referred for drug abuse or drug dependence treatment at any treatment resource that receives public funding shall be a priority user of available treatment. All records and reports regarding such pregnant woman shall be kept confidential. The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall ensure that family-oriented drug abuse or drug dependence treatment is available, as appropriations allow. A treatment resource that receives public funds shall not refuse to treat a person solely because the person is pregnant as long as appropriate services are offered by the treatment resource.

If during prenatal care, the attending obstetrical provider determines no later than the end of the twentieth week of pregnancy that the patient has used prescription drugs which may place the fetus in jeopardy, and drug abuse or drug dependence treatment is indicated, the provider shall encourage counseling, drug abuse or drug dependence treatment and other assistance to the patient.

If the patient initiates drug abuse or drug dependence treatment based upon a clinical assessment prior to her next regularly scheduled prenatal visit and maintains compliance with both drug abuse or drug dependence treatment based on a clinical assessment as well as prenatal care throughout the remaining term of the pregnancy, then the department of children's services shall not file any petition to terminate the mother's parental rights or otherwise seek protection of the newborn solely because of the patient's use of prescription drugs for non-medical purposes during the term of her pregnancy.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f)(2)(B), nothing shall prevent the department of children's services from filing any petition to terminate the mother's parental rights or seek protection of the newborn should the department determine that the newborn's mother, or any other adult caring for the newborn, is unfit to properly care for such child.

Any physician or other health care provider who does not recognize that the pregnant woman has used prescription drugs that place the fetus in jeopardy after a reasonable inquiry, or who complies with this subsection (f), or any physician or facility that initiates substance abuse treatment consistent with community standards of care pursuant to this subsection (f), shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and shall have immunity from any civil liability that might otherwise result by reason of such actions.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services is authorized to promulgate emergency rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 4; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 19; T.C.A., § 33-804; Acts 1989, ch. 441, § 1; 1990, ch. 931, § 1; 1990, ch. 966, § 1; 1993, ch. 234, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-8-103; Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 18; T.C.A. § 68-24-104; Acts 2013, ch. 398, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the growing misuse of prescription drugs by pregnant women, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 398.

Acts 2013, ch. 398, § 1 provided that the act, which added subsection (f), shall be known as the “Safe Harbor Act of 2013.”

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

33-10-105. Admission to inpatient programs.

Admission to inpatient programs under this chapter shall be governed by § 33-6-201, title 33, chapter 6, part 4 and title 33, chapter 6, part 5.

Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 6; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 29; 1976, ch. 763, § 9; 1981, ch. 224, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-806; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-8-104; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 8A, 8C, 8E; 2009, ch. 186, § 19; T.C.A. § 68-24-105.

33-10-106. Contracts in furtherance of department functions — Grants and gifts of funds.

The department, through its commissioner, is empowered to:

Enter into contractual agreements with institutions and individuals in furtherance of its function of prevention, treatment, training, research or education;

Accept grants and gifts of funds, from whatever source derived, administer the grants and gifts according to the terms of the grants or gifts and enter cooperative programs with private and public instrumentalities, including the federal government, for the betterment of alcohol and drug prevention and treatment services in the state;

Enter into contractual agreements with other states, or political subdivisions of other states, or corporations chartered in those other states, for the purpose of providing alcohol and drug services for those persons in need of prevention and treatment; and

Enter into contractual agreements with counties, or agencies of counties, of the state for the inpatient treatment of alcohol and drug patients or residents.

Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 4; 2009, ch. 186, § 20; T.C.A. § 68-24-106.